Washington statutes.
RCW 42.16.013

Transfers to state payroll revolving account—Certification by agencies or director of financial management.

The state treasurer shall make such transfers to the state payroll revolving account in the amounts to be disbursed as certified by the respective agencies: PROVIDED, That if the payroll is prepared on behalf of an agency from data authenticated and certified by the agency under a centralized system established pursuant to regulation of the director of financial management, the state treasurer shall make the transfer upon the certification of the head of the agency preparing the centralized payroll or his or her designee.

[ 2012 c 117 s 109; 1981 c 9 s 3; 1979 c 151 s 70; 1969 c 59 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 25 s 4.]